Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
ARTICLE 10
COUNTY OFFICERS

Cross references:

For election and terms of county officers, see §§ 6 and 8 of art. XIV, Colo. Const., and §§ 1-4-205 and 1-4-206; for prohibited appointments by outgoing officers, see § 24-50-402; for provisions regarding official bonds, see article 13 of title 24; for standards of conduct for county officials, see article 18 of title 24.

Section

PART 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS

PART 2 RECALL OF COUNTY OFFICERS

PART 3 COUNTY COMMISSIONERS

PART 4 COUNTY CLERK AND RECORDER

PART 5 SHERIFF

PART 6 CORONER

PART 7 TREASURER

PART 8 ASSESSOR

PART 9 SURVEYOR

PART 10 SUPERINTENDENT OF SCHOOLS